Colorado, session 2026A, HB1368.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-19.7-104, amend
(1) introductory portion and (1)(c); and repeal (1)(d) as follows:
23-19.7-104. Innovative higher education research fund -
funding.
(1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the innovative higher
education research fund, which shall consist CONSISTS of:
(c) Any moneys MONEY received pursuant to section 23-19.7-103
(1)(j); AND
(d) Any money transferred pursuant to section 44-30-701 (2); and
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-30-701, repeal
(2)(a)(IV) as follows:
44-30-701. Limited gaming fund - created - repeal.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, at the
end of the 2012-13 state fiscal year and at the end of each state fiscal year
thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer the state share as follows:
(IV) Two million one hundred thousand dollars to the innovative
higher education research fund created in section 23-19.7-104;
SECTION 3. Effective date. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1368

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1368